Utah statutes.
73-2-20.   Employees authorized to enter and cross lands -- Injuring monuments a crime.

(1)  In order to carry out the purposes of this title any person properly employed hereunder is authorized to enter and cross all lands within the state if no damage is done to private property.

(2)  It is a crime punishable under Section 73-2-27 for any person to knowingly or intentionally remove or injure any equipment, permanent marks, or monuments made or installed by any person properly employed under this title.



Amended by Chapter 215, 2005 General Session

